Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB254.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XV-OSTEM GRANT PROGRAMSection 1501-O. Scope of article.This article relates to the STEM Grant Program.Section 1502-O. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the 1234567891011121314151617181920 Commonwealth."Nonpublic school." A nonprofit organization, charter school, cyber charter school, private school or a nonprofit school, other than a public school, in this Commonwealth where a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. Ch. 21 Subch. V (relating to federally assisted programs)."Program." The STEM Grant Program under section 1503-O."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth."STEM." Science, technology, engineering and mathematics."STEM subject." A class for which the instruction relates to the topics of science, technology, engineering or mathematics.Section 1503-O. Administrations.(a) Selection of administrator.--Within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall issue a request for applications for an intermediate unit to administer the program.(b) Applications.--The selected administrator shall develop an application process for the program consistent with the provisions of section 1504-O(a).(c) Notification.--The selected administrator shall annually notify all educators employed by the school districts or nonpublic schools within this Commonwealth of the program and shall submit a list of all eligible educators who express interest in participating in the program to the department by January 15 of each year. The secretary shall post the list on the department's publicly accessible Internet website by January 30 of each year.(d) Awards.--The selected administrator shall be responsible 20250SB0254PN0205 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the distribution of awards as provided for under section 1505-O.(e) Fees.--The selected administrator shall utilize no more than 5% of the total appropriation for the program for administrative costs associated with this article.Section 1504-O. Application and acceptance.(a) Application.--A nonpublic school that elects to participate in the program shall submit an application to the secretary in a manner and on a form as determined by the secretary. The secretary shall establish the application deadlines for each school year. An application shall include the following:(1) The names of the public and nonpublic school and eligible educators from each that shall form a STEM partnership under the program.(2) A statement from the nonpublic school and the eligible educator that the eligible educator shall teach at the nonpublic school during hours when the educator has no conflicting public school duties.(3) The proposed schedule and grades to be taught by the eligible educator at the nonpublic school.(4) The number of students, based on enrollment projections, who will receive instruction from the eligible educator under the proposed schedule at the nonpublic school.(5) A certification from the nonpublic school that the eligible educator shall provide only secular instruction at the nonpublic school.(6) Any other information specified by the secretary.(b) Notification.--Upon receiving an application under subsection (a), the secretary shall, within 10 business days of 20250SB0254PN0205 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receipt of the application, notify the school district where the educator is employed of the partnership between the nonpublic school and the educator and shall detail the proposed schedule and grades to be taught by the educator at the nonpublic school. Section 1505-O. Grant awards.(a) Award.--The secretary shall award grants under the program based on review of the applications and subject to the limit of money appropriated or otherwise made available for the program. Grant money for approved applications shall be allocated by the department to the selected administrator.(b) Use of funds.--The selected administrator shall use the funds to provide compensation to a participating nonpublic school as reimbursement for costs incurred during the previous school year for the services of an eligible educator under the program. The secretary shall establish the amount of each grant awarded to a participating nonpublic school using the following calculation:(1) An eligible educator shall receive an amount equal to the educator's hourly wage multiplied by the number of hours the educator teaches STEM subjects at a nonpublic school under the program multiplied by a factor of 1.25 to account for preparatory time.(2) In the event that sufficient money is not appropriated to fully fund the compensation to be provided to eligible educators under paragraph (1), the secretary shall apportion the amount appropriated for the implementation of this article among the eligible educators in proportion to the compensation each participating eligible educator would have received had the full amount been appropriated.(c) Limitations.--20250SB0254PN0205 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Money appropriated to the department for the program shall be used exclusively for the hiring of eligible educators to teach STEM subjects at a participating nonpublic school. The eligible educator shall teach only the classes stipulated under the program.(2) The program may not infringe on the collective bargaining agreement between the majority representative of the collective negotiations unit in which the eligible educator is a member and the school district in which the educator is employed.(3) At the conclusion of each school year, a nonpublic school participating in the program shall submit a report to the secretary containing information on the implementation of the program in the nonpublic school. The report shall include:(i) The days and classroom hours that the eligible educator taught in the nonpublic school.(ii) Any scheduling obstacles that were encountered and how they were addressed.(iii) Any recommendations to improve the program and the effectiveness of the program.(iv) Number of students that joined the program.(v) Number of students who were denied access to the program due to the lack of eligible educators.(vi) Number of STEM students who applied to either a two-year or four-year college.(vii) Number of STEM students who were accepted to a two-year or four-year college.(viii) Any other information pertinent to the program.20250SB0254PN0205 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1506-O. Appropriation.The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the department for the purposes of this article. The appropriation under this section shall not lapse.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0254PN0205 - 6 - 12345